Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201850-1515
Attorney's fees and costs.

The prevailing party may request from the opposing party or the state the recovery of attorney’s fees and costs incurred in bringing or defending a petition to contest an election or challenge qualifications under the Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act. The request shall be filed with the Clerk of the Legislature within fifteen calendar days after the filing of the final report regarding the petition. The request shall include a detailed report of attorney’s fees and costs incurred by the prevailing party. The committee may decide that the prevailing party should receive attorney’s fees and costs. Any sum awarded shall be reasonable, just, and proper.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 22.
July 19, 2018